West Virginia, session 2025, HB2612.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2B. DNA DATA. §15-2B-10. DNA database exchange. (a) The West Virginia State Police shall receive DNA samples, store, analyze, classify and file the DNA records consisting of all identification characteristics of DNA profiles from DNA samples submitted pursuant to the procedures for conducting DNA analysis of DNA samples.(b) The West Virginia State Police may furnish DNA records to authorized law-enforcement and governmental agencies of the United States and its territories, of foreign countries duly authorized to receive them, of other states within the United States and of the State of West Virginia upon proper request stating that the DNA records requested will be used solely:(1) For law enforcement identification purposes by criminal justice agencies;(2) In judicial proceedings, if otherwise expressly permitted by state or federal laws;(3) If personal identifying information is removed, for a population statistics database, for identification research and protocol development purposes, or for quality control purposes; or(4) For the identification of unidentified human remains, missing persons and relatives of missing persons; or(5) For specific individuals pursuant to a Circuit Court Order to resolve paternity in a pending abuse and neglect case.(c) The Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police shall promulgate legislative rules pursuant to chapter twenty-nine-a of this code governing the methods by which any law-enforcement agency or other authorized entity may obtain information from the state DNA database consistent with this section and federal law.(d) The West Virginia State Police may release DNA samples, without personal identifying information, to any agency or entity with which the West Virginia State Police contracts pursuant to section five of this article. (e) The West Virginia State Police may release DNA samples for criminal defense and appeal purposes, to a defendant who is entitled to access to samples and analysis performed in connection with the case in which the defendant is charged or was convicted. (f) Searches of the state DNA database shall be performed in accordance with state and federal law and procedures.